California statutes. Water Code
(4) The Elsinore Valley Municipal Water District and the Eastern Municipal Water District shall notify Riverside County fire officials serving the County Water Company of Riverside service area of the condition and firefighting support capabilities of the existing County Water Company of Riverside water system and planned improvements with the installation of permanent replacement facilities thereto. The Elsinore Valley Municipal Water District and the Eastern Municipal Water District shall maintain or improve the condition and firefighting support capabilities of the existing County Water Company of Riverside water system during the interim operation period.

(5) Customers of the County Water Company of Riverside shall receive written notice upon
 any change in possession, control, or operation of the water system.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to do any of the following:

(1) Relieve any water district, water wholesaler, or any other entity from complying with any provision of federal or state law pertaining to drinking water quality.

(2) Impair any cause of action by the Attorney General, a district attorney, a city attorney, or any other public prosecutor, or impair any other action or proceeding brought by or on behalf of a regulatory agency.

(3) Impair any claim alleging the taking of property without compensation within the meaning of either the Fifth Amendment to the United States Constitution or Section 19 of Article I of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 173, Sec. 2.   (SB 1130)   Effective July 21, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6. FINANCIAL PROVISIONS [71800. - 71823.]



  CHAPTER 1. Warrants [71800. - 71801.]

71800.

A district may issue warrants to pay the formation expenses of the district. The warrants may bear interest at a rate not exceeding 8 percent per year from the date of issue until funds are available to pay the warrants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 721.)
-------------------------------------------

71801.

Formation expenses may include the fees of attorneys and others employed to conduct the formation proceedings, but shall not include the expenses of holding and conducting the formation election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Promissory Notes [71810. - 71814.]

71810.

A district may issue negotiable promissory notes pursuant to Sections 71811 and 71812. Such promissory notes shall bear interest at a rate not to exceed 12 percent per year. They shall be payable from revenues and taxes levied for purposes of the district other than the payment of principal and interest on any bonded debt of the district or of an improvement district therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 466, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

71810.5.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 71810 which limit the rate of interest which promissory notes issued by a district may bear, the Otay Municipal Water District may issue promissory notes which bear interest at a rate not exceeding 15 percent per year. All other provisions of Section 71810 shall be applicable to the issuance of such notes. No promissory notes shall be issued by the Otay Municipal Water District pursuant to this section after five years following the effective date of this section, provided that this provision shall not affect the validity of any such notes issued prior to such date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 274, Sec. 1.   Effective June 29, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

71811.

A district may issue negotiable promissory notes pursuant to this section to acquire funds for any district purposes. The maturity of the promissory notes shall not be later than five years from the date thereof. The total aggregate amount of the notes outstanding, at any one time, may be at least equal to seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) in any district but shall not exceed the lesser of either five million dollars ($5,000,000) or 3 percent of the assessed valuation of the taxable property in the district or, if the assessed valuation is not obtainable, 3 percent of the county auditor’s estimate of the assessed valuation of the taxable property in the district evidenced by his certificate . Promissory notes issued pursuant to Section 71812 may be disregarded in computing the aggregate amount of notes that may be issued pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 464, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

71812.

A district may issue negotiable promissory notes pursuant to this section for the purpose of acquiring funds to finance the construction or acquisition of administrative offices, construction headquarters, commercial offices, or facilities for similar district purposes and for the acquisition of land for district purposes. The maturity of such promissory notes shall not be later than 10 years from the date thereof. The total aggregate amount of such notes outstanding at any one time may be at least equal to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in any district, but shall not exceed the lesser of either three million dollars ($3,000,000) or 1 percent of the assessed valuation of the taxable property in the district, or, if the assessed valuation is not obtainable, 1 percent of the county auditor’s estimate of the assessed valuation of the taxable property in the district evidenced by his certificate. Promissory notes issued pursuant to Section 71811 may be disregarded in computing the aggregate amount of notes that may be issued pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 463, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

71813.

A district may borrow money in anticipation of the sale of, but not in excess of the principal amount of, authorized bonds of an improvement district formed pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 71870) or Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 71920) of Part 7 of this division which have not yet been sold and delivered, and for that purpose may issue and sell negotiable bond anticipation notes, and may refund such notes as provided in this section. Such notes may be issued in anticipation of the sale of all or any portion of the bonds which are duly authorized at the time the notes are issued. Such notes shall mature within a period not to exceed five years from the date of issuance. In the event that the sale of bonds shall not have occurred prior to the maturity of such notes, the district may issue renewal notes to meet the notes then maturing. There shall be only one renewal of any note issued pursuant to this section and such renewal note shall mature within a period not to exceed three years from the date of issuance. The notes shall be sold in such manner as the board may determine, and such notes and the resolution providing for the issuance of such notes may contain any provision, condition or limitation which a bond, or any resolution or ordinance providing for the issuance of bonds, may contain. The interest on bond anticipation notes shall be payable at the time or times provided in such notes and may be represented by interest coupons attached to the notes and shall be payable from the same funds from which the interest on bonds of the improvement district are payable. The principal of such notes may be paid from any moneys of the improvement district available for such purpose. If such notes, or any portion thereof, have not been previously paid, they shall be paid from the proceeds of the next sale of bonds in anticipation of which the notes were issued. The resolution providing for the issuance of bond anticipation notes may contain a provision that, if for any reason bonds of the improvement district are not sold in time to provide funds to pay any unpaid note, and, if other funds of the improvement district are not available for such payment, taxes shall be levied upon the taxable property in the improvement district for such payment in the same manner provided for the payment of bonds in such amount each year for such period of years as may be set forth in such resolution. To the extent bond anticipation notes are paid from a tax levy, authorized bonds in a corresponding amount shall be canceled and not issued thereafter. When bonds of the improvement district are issued and any portion of the proceeds of the sale are to be used to pay bond anticipation notes, such bond shall mature not later than the maximum permissible years for such bonds under Section 71951 from the date of such notes as originally issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 519.)
-------------------------------------------

71814.

A district may borrow money in anticipation of the sale of, but not in excess of the principal amount of, authorized bonds of the district which have not yet been sold and delivered, and for that purpose may issue and sell negotiable bond anticipation notes, and may refund such notes from time to time, but the maximum maturity of any such notes, as originally issued or as refunded, shall not exceed five years from the date of the original notes. The notes shall be sold in such manner as the board may determine, and such notes and the resolution providing for the issuance of such notes may contain any provision, condition or limitation which a bond, or any resolution or ordinance providing for the issuance of bonds, may contain. The interest on bond anticipation notes shall be payable at the time or times provided in such notes and may be represented by interest coupons attached to the notes and shall be payable from the same funds from which the interest on bonds of the district are payable. The principal of such notes may be paid from any moneys of the district available for such purpose. If such notes, or any portion thereof, have not been previously paid, they shall be paid from the proceeds of the next sale of bonds in anticipation of which the notes were issued. The resolution providing for the issuance of bond anticipation notes may contain a provision that, if for any reason bonds of the district are not sold in time to provide funds to pay any unpaid note, and, if other funds of the district are not available for such payment, taxes shall be levied upon the taxable property in the district for such payment in the same manner provided for the payment of bonds in such amount each year for such period of years as may be set forth in such resolution. To the extent bond anticipation notes are paid from a tax levy, authorized bonds in a corresponding amount shall be canceled and not issued thereafter. When bonds of the district are issued and any portion of the proceeds of the sale are to be used to pay bond anticipation notes, such bonds shall mature not later than the maximum permissible years for such bonds under Section 71951 from the date of such notes as originally issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 618.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Adoption of Improvement Acts [71820. - 71823.]

71820.

A district may use the Improvement Act of 1911, the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913, and the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 for the construction of any facilities authorized to be constructed by a district under the provisions of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 378.)
-------------------------------------------

71821.

The powers and duties conferred pursuant to Section 71820 on the various boards, officers, and agents of cities shall be exercised by the corresponding boards, officers, and agents of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 378.)
-------------------------------------------

71822.

In the application of the improvement acts specified in Section 71820 to proceedings instituted by a district, the terms used in such improvement acts have the following meanings:

(a) “City council,” “council,” or “legislative body” means the board of directors of the district.

(b) “Municipality” or “city” means the district.

(c) “Clerk” or “city clerk” means the secretary of the district.

(d) “Superintendent of streets,” “street superintendent,” or “city engineer” means any person appointed by the board to perform such duties.

(e) “Tax collector” means the county tax collector.

(f) “Treasurer” or “city treasurer” means the person or officer who has charge of and makes payment of the funds of the district.

(g) “Mayor” means the president of the board.

(h) “Right-of-way” means any parcel of land in, on, under, or through which a right-of-way or easement has been granted to the district for the purpose of contructing and maintaining any district works or improvements.

(i) “Auditor” means the county auditor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 378.)
-------------------------------------------

71823.

Any certificates or documents required by the improvement acts specified in Section 71820 to be filed or recorded in the office of the superintendent of streets or street superintendent shall be filed or recorded in the office of the secretary of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 378.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 7. BONDS [71852. - 71996.]



  CHAPTER 1. In General [71852. - 71854.]

71852.

A district may issue bonds pursuant to Chapters 2 (commencing with Section 71860) and 5 (commencing with Section 71940) of this part for the purpose of providing money required to be paid to any district or authority organized under the Metropolitan Water District Act or the County Water Authority Act by the board of directors of such district or authority as all or part of the terms and conditions upon which the corporate area of the district may be annexed to the metropolitan water district or county water authority. The amount of such bonds may include the expenses of all proceedings for the authorization, issuance, and sale of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71853.

A district may issue revenue bonds for any purpose for which general obligation bonds may be issued. Such revenue bonds may be issued pursuant to the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 or any other law which by its terms is applicable to districts formed under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71854.

A district that has outstanding revenue bonds which were approved by more than two-thirds of the votes cast at the election authorizing such bonds may incur a bonded indebtedness pursuant to this part for the purpose of refunding such revenue bonds, whether or not such revenue bonds are then due, and for the payment of all incidental expenses in connection with the refunding of such revenue bonds. Such general obligation bonds shall be authorized, issued, and sold in all respects as provided in this part for the authorization, issuance, and sale of general obligation bonds of a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 37.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Initiation of Proceedings for Issuance of Bonds for Entire District [71860. - 71861.]

71860.

Whenever the board deems it necessary for the district to incur a bonded indebtedness for the acquisition, construction, completion, or repair of any or all improvements, works, or property mentioned in this division, the board shall, by resolution, so declare and call an election to be held in the district for the purpose of submitting to the voters thereof the proposition of incurring indebtedness by the issuance of bonds of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71861.

The resolution calling the bond election shall state all of the following:

(a) The purpose for which the proposed debt is to be incurred, which may include expenses of all proceedings for the authorization, issuance, and sale of the bonds.

(b) The amount of debt to be incurred.

(c) The maximum term the bonds proposed to be issued shall run before maturity, which shall not exceed 40 years.

(d) The maximum rate of interest to be paid, which shall not exceed 8 percent per year, payable semiannually, except that interest for the first year may be payable at the end of that year.

(e) The measure to be submitted to the voters.

(f) The date upon which an election shall be held for the purpose of authorizing the bonded indebtedness to be incurred.

(g) The designation of precincts, the location of polling places, and the names of the officers selected to conduct the election, who shall consist of one judge, one inspector, and two clerks in each precinct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 130.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Formation of Improvement Districts for Issuance of Bonds [71870. - 71911.]



  ARTICLE 1. Initiation of Proceedings [71870. - 71875.]

71870.

Whenever the board deems it necessary to incur a bonded indebtedness for the acquisition, construction, completion, or repair of any or all improvements, works, or property mentioned in this division and to provide for such bonded indebtedness to be payable from taxes levied upon less than all of the district, the board shall, by resolution, declare its intention to form an improvement district and to incur such indebtedness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71871.

The resolution of intention shall state that the board intends to form an improvement district of a portion of the district which in the opinion of the board will be benefited, and to call an election in such proposed improvement district, on a date to be fixed, for the purpose of submitting to the voters thereof the proposition of incurring indebtedness by the issuance of bonds of the district for such improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71872.

The resolution of intention shall also state:

(a) The purpose for which the proposed debt is to be incurred.

(b) The amount of debt to be incurred, which may include expenses of all proceedings for the authorization, issuance, and sale of the bonds.

(c) That taxes for the payment of the bonds and the interest thereon will be levied exclusively upon the taxable property in the improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71873.

The resolution of intention shall also state that a general description of the proposed improvement, together with a map showing the exterior boundaries of the proposed improvement district with relation to the territory immediately contiguous thereto and to the proposed improvement is on file with the secretary and is available for inspection by any person or persons interested. This map shall govern for all details as to the extent of the proposed improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71874.

The resolution of intention shall also state:

(a) The time and place for a hearing by the board on the questions of the formation and extent of the proposed improvement district, the proposed improvement, and the amount of debt to be incurred.

(b) That at the time and place specified in the resolution any person interested, including all persons owning property in the district or in the proposed improvement district, will be heard.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71875.

Notice of the hearing shall be given by publishing a copy of the resolution of intention pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code prior to the time fixed for the hearing in a newspaper printed and published in the district, if there is a newspaper printed and published in the district. Such notice shall also be given by posting a copy of the resolution of intention in six public places within the proposed improvement district at least two weeks before the time fixed for the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Hearing and Changes [71880. - 71883.]

71880.

At the time and place fixed in the resolution of intention, or at any time and place to which the hearing is adjourned, the board shall proceed with the hearing. At the hearing any person interested, including any person owning property within the district or within the proposed improvement district, may appear and present any matters material to the questions set forth in the resolution of intention.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71881.

The board may change the purpose for which the proposed debt is to be incurred or the amount of bonded debt to be incurred, or both. The board may also change the boundaries of the proposed improvement district, but not so as to include any territory that will not, in its judgment, be benefited by the proposed improvement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 91, Sec. 182.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

71882.

The purpose or amount of bonded debt or the boundaries of the proposed improvement district shall not be changed by the board except after notice of its intention to do so, given by publication pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in a newspaper printed and published in the district, if there is a newspaper printed and published in the district, and by posting in six public places within the proposed improvement district. The notice shall state the changed purpose and debt proposed and that the exterior boundaries as proposed to be changed are set forth on a map on file with the secretary which map shall govern for all details as to the extent of the proposed improvement district, and shall specify the time and place for hearing on such change, which time shall be at least 10 days after publication or posting of the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71883.

At the time and place fixed in the notice of intention, or at any time and place to which the hearing is adjourned, the board shall proceed with the hearing. At the hearing any person interested, including any person owning property within the district or the proposed improvement district, may appear and present any matters material to the changes stated in the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Formation [71890. - 71892.]

71890.

At the conclusion of the hearing, the board shall by resolution determine whether it is deemed necessary to incur the bonded indebtedness. If so, the resolution shall also state:

(a) The purpose for which the proposed debt is to be incurred.

(b) The amount of the proposed debt.

(c) That the exterior boundaries of the portion of the district which will be benefited are set forth on a map on file with the secretary, which map shall govern for all details as to the extent of the improvement district.

(d) That such portion of the district set forth on the map shall thereupon constitute and be known as “Improvement District No. ____ of ____ Municipal Water District.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71891.

The determinations made in the resolution of formation shall be final and conclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71892.

After the formation of the improvement district pursuant to this chapter, all proceedings for the purpose of a bond election shall be limited, and shall apply only, to the improvement district, and taxes for the payment of the bonds and the interest thereon shall be levied exclusively upon the taxable property in the improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Calling on Bond Election [71900. - 71901.]

71900.

After the Board has made its determination of the matters required to be determined by the resolution of formation, and if the board deems it necessary to incur the bonded indebtedness, the board shall by a futher resolution call a special election in the improvement district for the purpose of submitting to the voters thereof the proposition of incurring indebtedness by the issuance of bonds of the district for the improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71901.

The resolution calling the bond election shall contain all of the statements required by Section 71861 and, in addition, shall state:

(a) That the board deems it necessary to incur the bonded indebtedness.

(b) The improvement district to be benefited by the bonded indebtedness, as set forth in the resolution of formation of the improvement district, and that a map showing the exterior boundaries of the improvement district is on file with the secretary, which map shall govern for all details as to the extent of the improvement district.

(c) That taxes for the payment of such bonds and the interest thereon shall be levied exclusively upon the taxable property in the improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Advance of Funds [71910. - 71911.]

71910.

The board may advance general funds of the district to accomplish the purposes of an improvement district formed pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71911.

The board may repay the district for any advance of funds from the proceeds of the sale of bonds authorized for the purposes of the improvement district or as provided in Section 71616. To the extent that advances made for improvements for which such bonds were authorized are repaid from funds other than the proceeds of the sale of bonds of the improvement district, the authority of the board to issue bonds of the improvement district in a like amount or amounts shall terminate. The treasurer shall maintain proper records and accounts in which there shall be set forth all repayments of advances to the extent that advances are made for the improvements for which such bonds were authorized and, to the extent that such repayments reduce the amount of bonds which may be issued on behalf of any improvement district, the net principal amount of authorized but unissued bonds of such improvement district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 708.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Formation of Uninhabited Improvement Districts for Issuance of Bonds [71920. - 71937.]



  ARTICLE 1. Initiation of Proceedings [71920. - 71924.]

71920.

Whenever the board deems it necessary to incur a bonded indebtedness for the acquisition, construction, completion, or repair of any or all improvements, works, or property mentioned in this division and to provide for such bonded indebtedness to be payable from taxes levied upon an uninhabited portion of the district, the board shall, by resolution, declare its intention to form an uninhabited improvement district in such portion of the district and to incur such indebtedness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71921.

For the purposes of this chapter the portion of a district formed into an uninhabited improvement district shall be deemed uninhabited if less than 12 voters reside therein at the time of the formation thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71922.

The resolution of intention shall state that the board intends to form an improvement district of an uninhabited portion of the district which in the opinion of the board will be benefited, and to call an election in such proposed improvement district, on a date to be fixed, for the purpose of submitting to the voters thereof the proposition of incurring indebtedness by the issuance of bonds of the district for such uninhabited improvement district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

71923.

The resolution of intention shall also state:

(a) The purpose for which the proposed debt is to be incurred.

(b) The amount of debt to be incurred, which may include expenses of all proceedings for the authorization, issuance, and sale of the bonds.

(c) That taxes for the payment of the bonds and the interest thereon will be levied exclusively upon the taxable property in the uninhabited improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71924.

The resolution of intention shall also state that a general description of the proposed improvement, together with a map showing the exterior boundaries of the proposed uninhabited improvement district with relation to the territory immediately contiguous thereto and to the proposed improvement is on file with the secretary and is available for inspection by any person or persons interested. This map shall govern for all details as to the extent of the proposed uninhabited improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Bond Election [71930. - 71934.]

71930.

After the board has made its determination of the matters required to be determined by the resolution of intention, and if the board deems it necessary to form the improvement district and to incur the bonded indebtedness, the board shall by a formation resolution call a special election in the proposed uninhabited improvement district for the purpose of submitting to the voters thereof the proposition of forming the uninhabited improvement district and incurring indebtedness by the issuance of bonds of the district for the uninhabited improvement district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

71930.5.

The provisions of this article apply only to bond elections called pursuant to this chapter. The provisions of Section 2502 of the Elections Code, relating to mandatory consolidation of elections, shall not apply to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 265.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

71931.

Voter means a person who is a holder of title. Each voter shall have one vote for each dollar’s worth of assessed value of land to which he holds title. The last equalized assessment roll of the county is conclusive evidence of ownership and of the value of the land so owned. Where title is held by two or more persons in undivided interests, the manner in which such interest may be voted shall be provided in the resolution calling the election.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

71931.5.

The form and type of ballot to be used in the election and the manner of distribution thereof, to the voters, will be determined by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

71932.

All ballots shall be returned to the secretary of the district at the office of the district on or before the last date established for the return of the ballots by the board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

71932.5.

Within 10 days after the date on which all ballots must be received by the district, the board shall canvass the votes and declare the result.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

71933.

Each ballot will give the voter the option of voting in favor of or in opposition to the formation of the improvement district and incurring indebtedness by the issuance of bonds of the district for the improvement district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

71933.5.

If a majority of the votes cast are in favor of the formation of the improvement district and incurring indebtedness by the issuance of bonds of the district for the improvement district, the improvement district shall be formed and bonds may be issued pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 71950) of this part. If a majority of the votes cast are against the formation of the improvement district and incurring indebtedness by the issuance of bonds of the district for the improvement district, the improvement district shall not be formed and no bonds shall be issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

71934.

Voting may be by proxy and every appointment of a proxy is revocable at the pleasure of the person executing it by giving written notice to the district any time before the person appointed as proxy shall cast a ballot representing the votes for which the proxy was given.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Advance of Funds [71936. - 71937.]

71936.

The board may advance general funds of the district to accomplish the purposes of an improvement district formed pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1151.)
-------------------------------------------

71937.

The board may repay the district for any advance of funds from the proceeds of the sale of bonds authorized for the purposes of the improvement district or as provided in Section 71616. To the extent that advances made for improvements for which such bonds were authorized are repaid from the funds other than the proceeds of the sale of bonds of the improvement district, the authority of the board to issue bonds of the improvement district in a like amount or amounts shall terminate. The treasurer shall maintain proper records and accounts in which there shall be set forth all repayments of advances to the extent that advances are made for the improvements for which such bonds were authorized and, to the extent that such repayments reduce the amount of bonds which may be issued on behalf of any improvement district, the net principal amount of authorized but unissued bonds of such improvement district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 708.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Bond Election [71940. - 71947.]

71940.

The board shall provide for holding the bond election on the day fixed in the resolution calling the election and in accordance with the provisions of the Elections Code, so far as they shall be applicable, except as otherwise provided in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71941.

Notice of the holding of the bond election shall be given by publishing, pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code, the resolution calling the election in at least one newspaper published in the district. The last publication shall be made not less than two weeks prior to the date of the proposed election. If there is no newspaper published in the district, then the resolution shall be posted in three public places in the district not less than two weeks prior to the date of the proposed election. No other notice of the election need be given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71942.

If the bond election is to be held in an improvement district, notice of the holding of such election shall be given by publishing, pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code, the resolution calling the election prior to the date of the proposed election in at least one newspaper printed and published in the municipal water district, if there is a newspaper printed and published in the district. Such resolution shall also be posted in three public places in the improvement district not less than two weeks prior to the date of the proposed election. No other notice of the election need be given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71943.

The returns of the bond election shall be made, the votes canvassed by the board within seven days following the election, and the results thereof ascertained and declared in accordance with the provisions of the Elections Code, so far as they may be applicable, except as otherwise provided in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71944.

The secretary, as soon as the result of the bond election is declared, shall enter in the records of the board a statement of such results.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71945.

No irregularities or informalities in conducting the bond election shall invalidate it, if the election has otherwise been fairly conducted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71946.

Any action or proceeding in which the validity of any bonds or of the proceedings in relation thereto (including the formation of an improvement district for which bonds are authorized to be issued by the voters thereof at a bond election) is contested, questioned, or denied shall be commenced within three months from the date of the bond election; otherwise the bonds and all proceedings in relation thereto (including the formation of the improvement district) shall be held to be valid and in every respect legal and incontestable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71947.

If bonds have been authorized at an election held pursuant to this chapter prior to January 1, 1960, a portion of which bonds have not yet been issued, and the board determines that the sale of such unissued portion would be insufficient to finance the completion of the improvement for which the bonds were authorized, the board by resolution adopted prior to January 1, 1972, may modify the improvement and may authorize the issuance of bonds in an amount not exceeding the amount of such unissued portion for the purpose of paying the cost of the improvement as modified, without any further election, but only after notice and hearing in the same manner as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 71880) of Chapter 3 of this part and Article 6 (commencing with Section 53520) of Chapter 3, Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code, and provided that at the conclusion of the hearing the board shall by resolution determine that the territory within the district or improvement district will be benefited by the improvement as modified. Bonds so authorized may be issued and sold in the same manner as bonds authorized by an election under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Issuance and Sale of Bonds [71950. - 71975.]



  ARTICLE 1. Issuance and Terms [71950. - 71960.]

71950.

If from the bond election returns it appears that more than two-thirds of the votes cast in such election were in favor of and assented to the incurring of the indebtedness, the board may, by resolution, at such time or times as it deems proper, issue bonds of the district for the whole or any part of the amount of the indebtedness so authorized, and may from time to time provide for the issuance of such amounts as the necessity thereof may appear, until the full amount of such bonds authorized has been issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71951.
